Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2263
State long-term care ombudsman and ombudsman advocate; immunity from liability; legal counsel.

No state long-term care ombudsman or ombudsman advocate shall be liable for the good faith performance of official duties pursuant to the Long-Term Care Ombudsman Act. Pursuant to the Older Americans Act, the department shall ensure that adequate legal counsel is available to the office for advice and consultation and that legal representation is provided to any state long-term care ombudsman or ombudsman advocate against whom any legal action is brought in connection with his or her official duties.

Laws 1992, LB 677, § 27.